Indiana, session 2026, SB182.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 1-1-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The following definitions apply to the
construction of all Indiana statutes, unless the construction is plainly
repugnant to the intent of the general assembly or of the context of the
statute:
(1) "Adult", "of full age", and "person in his majority" mean a
person at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(2) "Attorney" includes a counselor or other person authorized to
appear and represent a party in an action or special proceeding.
(3) "Autism" means a neurological condition as described in the
most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.
(4) "Bond" does not necessarily imply a seal.
(5) "Clerk" means the clerk of the court or a person authorized to
perform the clerk's duties.
(6) "Female", when referencing the human species, means an
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


individual who naturally has, had, will have, or would have,
but for a congenital anomaly, an intentional disruption, or an
unintentional disruption, the reproductive system that at some
point produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization.
(7) "Gender" is a synonym for sex and has the meaning set
forth in subdivision (25).
(6) (8) "Health record", "hospital record", or "medical record"
means written or printed information possessed by a provider (as
defined in IC 16-18-2-295) concerning any diagnosis, treatment,
or prognosis of the patient, unless otherwise defined. Except as
otherwise provided, the terms include mental health records and
drug and alcohol abuse records.
(7) (9) "Highway" includes county bridges and state and county
roads, unless otherwise expressly provided.
(8) (10) "Infant" or "minor" means a person less than eighteen
(18) years of age.
(9) (11) "Inhabitant" may be construed to mean a resident in any
place.
(10) (12) "Judgment" means all final orders, decrees, and
determinations in an action and all orders upon which executions
may issue.
(11) (13) "Land", "real estate", and "real property" include lands,
tenements, and hereditaments.
(14) "Male", when referencing the human species, means an
individual who naturally has, had, will have, or would have,
but for a congenital anomaly, an intentional disruption, or an
unintentional disruption, the reproductive system that at some
point produces, transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization.
(12) (15) "Mentally incompetent" means of unsound mind.
(13) (16) "Money demands on contract", when used in reference
to an action, means an action arising out of contract when the
relief demanded is a recovery of money.
(14) (17) "Month" means a calendar month, unless otherwise
expressed.
(15) (18) "Noncode statute" means a statute that is not codified as
part of the Indiana Code.
(16) (19) "Oath" includes "affirmation", and "to swear" includes
to "affirm".
(17) (20) "Person" extends to bodies politic and corporate.
(18) (21) "Personal property" includes goods, chattels, evidences
of debt, and things in action.
(19) (22) "Population" has the meaning set forth in IC 1-1-3.5-3.
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


(20) (23) "Preceding" and "following", referring to sections in
statutes, mean the sections next preceding or next following that
in which the words occur, unless some other section is designated.
(21) (24) "Property" includes personal and real property.
(25) "Sex" refers to the two (2) sexes, female and male, in the
human species with the organization of anatomy, hormones,
and gametes oriented toward fertilization without regard to
the individual's psychological, behavioral, social, chosen, or
subjective experience of gender.
(22) (26) "Sheriff" means the sheriff of the county or another
person authorized to perform sheriff's duties.
(23) (27) "State", applied to any one (1) of the United States,
includes the District of Columbia and the commonwealths,
possessions, states in free association with the United States, and
the territories. "United States" includes the District of Columbia
and the commonwealths, possessions, states in free association
with the United States, and the territories.
(24) (28) "Under legal disabilities" includes persons less than
eighteen (18) years of age, mentally incompetent, or out of the
United States.
(25) (29) "Verified", when applied to pleadings, means supported
by oath or affirmation in writing.
(26) (30) "Will" includes a testament and codicil.
(27) (31) "Without relief" in any judgment, contract, execution,
or other instrument of writing or record, means without the
benefit of valuation laws.
(28) (32) "Written" and "in writing" include printing,
lithographing, or other mode of representing words and letters. If
the written signature of a person is required, the terms mean the
proper handwriting of the person or the person's mark.
(29) (33) "Year" means a calendar year, unless otherwise
expressed.
(30) (34) The definitions in IC 35-31.5 apply to all statutes
relating to penal offenses.
(b) This subsection applies to the definitions of "Hoosier veteran"
and "veteran" when used in reference to state programs for veterans.
The term "veteran" includes "Hoosier veteran", and applies to the
construction of all Indiana statutes, unless the construction is expressly
excluded by the terms of the statute, is plainly repugnant to the intent
of the general assembly or of the context of the statute, or is
inconsistent with federal law. "Hoosier veteran" means an individual
who meets the following criteria:
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


(1) The individual is a resident of Indiana.
(2) The individual served in an active or reserve component of the
armed forces of the United States or the Indiana National Guard.
(3) The individual completed any required military occupational
specialty training and was not discharged or separated from the
armed forces or the Indiana National Guard under conditions
other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
The definitions set forth in this subsection may not be construed to
affect a Hoosier veteran's eligibility for any state program that is based
upon a particular aspect of the Hoosier veteran's service such as a
disability or a wartime service requirement.
SECTION 2. IC 11-10-1-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Upon completion
of the evaluation prescribed in section 2 of this chapter and before
assigning him an offender to a facility or program, the department
shall determine the appropriate degree of security (maximum, medium,
or minimum) for each offender as described in IC 35-38-3-6. In making
that determination the department shall, in addition to other relevant
information, consider:
(1) the results of the evaluation prescribed in section 2 of this
chapter;
(2) the recommendations of the sentencing court; and
(3) the degree and kind of custodial control necessary for the
protection of the public, staff, other confined persons, and the
individual being considered.
(b) After determining the offender's security classification, the
department shall assign him the offender to a facility or program;
make an initial employment, education, training, or other assignment
within that facility or program; and order medical, psychiatric,
psychological, or other services. In making the assignment, the
department shall, in addition to other relevant information, consider:
(1) the results of the evaluation prescribed in section 2 of this
chapter;
(2) the offender's security classification;
(3) the offender's need for special therapy or programs, including
employment, education, or training available only in specific
facilities or programs;
(4) the likelihood of the offender's reintegration into the
community in which the facility or program is located;
(5) the desirability of keeping the offender in a facility or program
near the area in which he the offender resided before
commitment;
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


(6) the desires of the offender;
(7) the current population levels of the facilities or programs
considered appropriate for the offender; and
(8) the length of the offender's sentence.
(c) If the department determines that a committed offender is
mentally or physically incapacitated to such an extent that proper
custody, care, and control cannot be provided by the department, it
shall make arrangements for placement outside the department.
(d) Before assigning an offender to a facility or program, the
department shall give him the offender an opportunity to present
pertinent information; discuss with him the offender all aspects of the
evaluation, classification, and assignment process; and work with him
the offender to determine a fair and appropriate assignment.
(e) The department shall assign an offender to a facility or
program that is based on the offender's sex, as defined by
IC 1-1-4-5(a)(25), at birth.
(e) (f) If an offender is sentenced to a term of imprisonment of one
(1) year or less, the department may make an assignment under this
section without making the evaluation prescribed in section 2 of this
chapter. In determining the length of an offender's term, consecutive
terms of imprisonment shall be added together.
(f) (g) This section does not prohibit the temporary assignment of
an offender pending evaluation and classification.
SECTION 3. IC 11-10-2-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Upon completion
of the evaluation prescribed in section 4 of this chapter, the department
shall assign the offender to a facility or program; make an initial
education, training, employment, or other assignment within that
facility or program; and order medical, psychiatric, psychological, or
other services it considers appropriate. In making the assignment, the
department shall, among other relevant information, consider:
(1) the results of the evaluation prescribed in section 4 of this
chapter;
(2) the recommendations of the committing court;
(3) the offender's need for special therapy or programs, including
education, training, or employment available only in specific
facilities or programs;
(4) the degree and type of custodial control necessary for the
protection of the public, staff, other committed offenders, and the
individual being considered;
(5) the likelihood of the offender's reintegration into the
community in which the facility or program is located;
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


(6) the desirability of keeping the offender in a facility or program
near the area in which he the offender resided before
commitment;
(7) the desires of the offender and his the offender's parents,
guardian, or custodian;
(8) the current population levels of the facilities or programs
considered appropriate for the offender; and
(9) the probable length of commitment.
(b) If the department determines that a committed offender is
mentally or physically incapacitated to such an extent that proper
custody, care, and control cannot be provided by the department, it
shall make arrangements for placement outside the department.
(c) If an offender is found to be pregnant, the department may return
her to the committing court for further disposition.
(d) Before assigning an offender to a facility or program, the
department shall give him the offender an opportunity to present
pertinent information, discuss with him the offender all aspects of the
evaluation and assignment process, and work with him the offender to
determine a fair and appropriate assignment.
(e) The department shall assign an offender to a facility or
program that is based on the offender's sex, as defined by
IC 1-1-4-5(a)(25), at birth.
(e) (f) The department shall, by certified mail, return receipt
requested, notify the parent, guardian, custodian, or nearest relative of
any committed offender of his the offender's physical location and any
change in that location.
(f) (g) This section does not preclude the temporary assignment of
an offender pending evaluation.
SECTION 4. IC 16-37-2-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.138-2019,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The local health officer shall make a
permanent record of the following from a birth certificate:
(1) Name.
(2) Sex, as defined by IC 1-1-4-5(a)(25), either male or female.
(3) Date of birth.
(4) Place of birth.
(5) Name of the parents.
(6) Birthplace of the parents.
(7) The date of filing of the certificate of birth.
(8) The person in attendance at the birth.
(9) Location of the birth, including whether the birth occurred at
a hospital, licensed health care facility, home, or other non-health
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


care facility.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), the permanent record shall
be open to public inspection. Upon request by an individual, a paper
copy of the permanent record in subsection (a) must be provided by the
local health officer.
(c) The birth record of an adopted child remains subject to the
confidentiality provisions of IC 31-19 regarding the release of adoption
information.
(d) The permanent record of the information required under this
section may be maintained in the Indiana birth registration system
(IBRS).
SECTION 5. IC 16-37-2-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) As used in this
section, "DNA test" means an identification process in which the
unique genetic code of an individual that is carried by the individual's
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) is compared with the genetic codes of
another individual.
(b) The state department may make additions to or corrections in a
certificate of birth on receipt of adequate documentary evidence,
including based on either the results of a DNA test under subsection
(c) or a paternity affidavit executed under section 2.1 of this chapter.
(c) The state department may make an addition to a birth certificate,
for purposes of paternity, based on the results of a DNA test only if:
(1) a father is not named on the birth certificate; and
(2) a citation to this subsection as the authority for the addition is
noted on the birth certificate.
(d) The sex designation on a birth certificate may not be
amended, except for either of the following:
(1) A medically verifiable genetic or physiological disorder of
sex development, including the following:
(A) External sex characteristics that are irresolvably
ambiguous.
(B) Forty-six (46) XX chromosomes with virilization.
(C) Forty-six (46) XY chromosomes with undervirilization.
(D) Both ovarian and testicular tissues.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (e), a correction of a
birth certificate that was previously amended to record a sex
other than the sex designation of the individual.
(e) An individual applying for a corrected birth certificate
under subsection (d)(2) must present a state vital record, federal
record, or other documentation bearing the correct sex or attesting
to the change.
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


SECTION 6. IC 20-33-13.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13.6. Physical Privacy of Students
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a school
building that may be used by more than one (1) student at a time
and in which students may be in various stages of undress in the
presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a family restroom, single
occupancy restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower
room.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "school" means any:
(1) school maintained by a school corporation; or
(2) charter school;
that provides instruction to students in any combination of
kindergarten through grade 12.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "sleeping quarters" means a
room with a bed in which more than one (1) individual is housed
overnight.
Sec. 4. Each school shall designate each multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 5. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual shall only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex.
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex;
(2) individual is less than nine (9) years of age and is
accompanying their parent or caregiver into a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area; or
(3) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany a student needing assistance if the
individual assisting the student is the student's parent or
caregiver.
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


(D) To provide coaching or athletic training during athletic
events, provided the individual providing coaching or
training took reasonable steps to ensure no individuals are
in a state of undress prior to entering.
Sec. 6. During any activity or event authorized by a school in
which students share sleeping quarters, a school shall not require
a student to share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite
sex, unless the individual of the opposite sex is a member of the
student's family.
Sec. 7. (a) An individual who encounters an individual violating
section 5 of this chapter may bring a civil action against the school
corporation or school if the school corporation or school:
(1) provided the individual who violated section 5 of this
chapter permission to use a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area that is designated for the sex that is not the
individual's sex; or
(2) failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the individual
who violated section 5 of this chapter from using a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated for
the sex that is not the individual's sex.
(b) If a school or school corporation violates section 6 of this
chapter, an individual who is directly or indirectly injured as a
result of the violation may bring a civil action against the school or
school corporation.
(c) An action described in this section must be commenced
within two (2) years of the violation.
Sec. 8. The court may award to an individual who prevails in an
action under section 7 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Declaratory judgment.
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 9. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a school corporation or
school from:
(1) providing single occupancy sleeping quarters or a single
occupancy restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower
room; or
(2) adopting policies necessary to accommodate individuals
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42
U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and any amendments and regulations
related to the Act.
Sec. 10. The provisions of this chapter are severable as provided
in IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


SECTION 7. IC 21-39-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10. Physical Privacy of Students
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a state
educational institution building that may be used by more than one
(1) student at a time and in which students may be in various stages
of undress in the presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a family restroom, single
occupancy restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower
room.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "sleeping quarters" means a
room with a bed in which more than one (1) individual is housed
overnight.
Sec. 3. Each state educational institution shall designate each
multiple occupancy restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 4. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual shall only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex.
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex;
(2) individual is less than nine (9) years of age and is
accompanying their parent or caregiver into a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area; or
(3) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany a student needing assistance if the
individual assisting the student is the student's parent or
caregiver.
(D) To provide coaching or athletic training during athletic
events, provided the individual providing coaching or
training took reasonable steps to ensure no individuals are
in a state of undress prior to entering.
Sec. 5. A state educational institution shall not require a student
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


to share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite sex:
(1) during any activity or event authorized by a state
educational institution; or
(2) in state educational institution on campus housing;
unless the individual who is a member of the opposite sex is a
member of the student's family.
Sec. 6. (a) An individual who encounters an individual violating
section 4 of this chapter may bring a civil action against the state
educational institution if the state educational institution:
(1) provided the individual who violated section 4 of this
chapter permission to use a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area that is designated for the sex that is not the
individual's sex; or
(2) failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the individual
who violated section 4 of this chapter from using a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated for
the sex that is not the individual's sex.
(b) If a state educational institution violates section 5 of this
chapter, an individual who is directly or indirectly injured as a
result of the violation may bring a civil action against the state
educational institution.
(c) An action described in this section must be commenced
within two (2) years of the violation.
Sec. 7. The court may award to an individual who prevails in an
action under section 6 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Declaratory judgment.
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 8. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a state educational
institution from:
(1) providing single occupancy sleeping quarters or a single
occupancy restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower
room; or
(2) adopting policies necessary to accommodate individuals
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42
U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and any amendments and regulations
related to the Act.
Sec. 9. The provisions of this chapter are severable as provided
in IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SECTION 8. IC 24-15-2-14, AS ADDED BY P.L.94-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. "Health record" has the meaning set forth in
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


IC 1-1-4-5(a)(6). IC 1-1-4-5(a)(8).
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Health and Provider
Services, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 182, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 1, line 17, delete "Except as provided in subsection (c),
"female"," and insert ""Female",".
Page 2, line 6, delete ", when used alone to refer to males, females,
or".
Page 2, line 7, delete "the natural differences between males and
females".
Page 2, line 8, delete "." and insert "and has the meaning set forth
in subdivision (25).".
Page 2, line 26, delete "Except as provided in subsection (c),
"male"," and insert ""Male",".
Page 3, line 8, delete "Except as provided in subsection (c), "sex""
and insert ""Sex"".
Page 3, line 10, delete "the anatomy," and insert "anatomy,".
Page 3, line 10, delete "the gametes" and insert "gametes".
Page 4, delete lines 16 through 23.
Page 5, line 27, delete "biological".
Page 6, line 33, delete "biological".
Page 7, line 40, delete "for:" and insert "for either of the
following:".
Page 7, line 41, delete "a" and insert "A".
Page 7, line 41, after "verifiable" insert "genetic or physiological".
Page 7, line 42, delete "an individual with:" and insert "the
following:".
Page 8, line 1, delete "external" and insert "External".
Page 8, line 1, delete "irremovably" and insert "irresolvably".
Page 8, line 2, delete "ambiguous;" and insert "ambiguous.".
Page 8, line 3, delete "forty-six" and insert "Forty-six".
Page 8, line 3, delete "virilization;" and insert "virilization.".
Page 8, line 4, delete "forty-six" and insert "Forty-six".
Page 8, line 4, delete "undervirilization;" and insert
"undervirilization.".
Page 8, delete line 5.
Page 8, line 6, delete "both" and insert "Both".
Page 8, line 6, delete "issues; or" and insert "tissues.".
Page 8, line 7, delete "except" and insert "Except".
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


Page 8, line 8, delete "is voluntarily" and insert "was previously".
Page 8, line 9, after "sex" insert "designation".
Page 8, line 9, delete "individual as previously recorded at birth."
and insert "individual.".
Page 8, between lines 13 and 14, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 6. IC 20-33-13.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13.6. Physical Privacy of Students
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a school
building that may be used by more than one (1) student at a time
and in which students may be in various stages of undress in the
presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "school" means any:
(1) school maintained by a school corporation; or
(2) charter school;
that provides instruction to students in any combination of
kindergarten through grade 12.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "sleeping quarters" means a
room with a bed in which more than one (1) individual is housed
overnight.
Sec. 4. Each school shall designate each multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 5. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual shall only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex.
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex; or
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany a student needing assistance if the
individual assisting the student is the student's parent or
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


caregiver.
(D) To provide coaching or athletic training during athletic
events, provided the individual providing coaching or
training took reasonable steps to ensure no individuals are
in a state of undress prior to entering.
Sec. 6. During any activity or event authorized by a school in
which students share sleeping quarters, a school shall not require
a student to share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite
sex, unless the individual of the opposite sex is a member of the
student's family.
Sec. 7. (a) An individual who encounters an individual violating
section 5 of this chapter may bring a civil action against the school
corporation or school if the school corporation or school:
(1) provided the individual who violated section 5 of this
chapter permission to use a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area that is designated for the sex that is not the
individual's sex; or
(2) failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the individual
who violated section 5 of this chapter from using a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated for
the sex that is not the individual's sex.
(b) If a school or school corporation violates section 6 of this
chapter, an individual who is directly or indirectly injured as a
result of the violation may bring a civil action against the school or
school corporation.
(c) An action described in this section must be commenced
within two (2) years of the violation.
Sec. 8. The court may award to an individual who prevails in an
action under section 7 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Declaratory judgment.
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 9. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a school corporation or
school from:
(1) providing single occupancy sleeping quarters or a single
occupancy restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower
room; or
(2) adopting policies necessary to accommodate individuals
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42
U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and any amendments and regulations
related to the Act.
Sec. 10. The provisions of this chapter are severable as provided
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


in IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SECTION 7. IC 21-39-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10. Physical Privacy of Students
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a state
educational institution building that may be used by more than one
(1) student at a time and in which students may be in various stages
of undress in the presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "sleeping quarters" means a
room with a bed in which more than one (1) individual is housed
overnight.
Sec. 3. Each state educational institution shall designate each
multiple occupancy restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 4. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual shall only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex.
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex; or
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany a student needing assistance if the
individual assisting the student is the student's parent or
caregiver.
(D) To provide coaching or athletic training during athletic
events, provided the individual providing coaching or
training took reasonable steps to ensure no individuals are
in a state of undress prior to entering.
Sec. 5. A state educational institution shall not require a student
to share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite sex:
(1) during any activity or event authorized by a state
educational institution; or
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


(2) in state educational institution on campus housing;
unless the individual who is a member of the opposite sex is a
member of the student's family.
Sec. 6. (a) An individual who encounters an individual violating
section 4 of this chapter may bring a civil action against the state
educational institution if the state educational institution:
(1) provided the individual who violated section 4 of this
chapter permission to use a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area that is designated for the sex that is not the
individual's sex; or
(2) failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the individual
who violated section 4 of this chapter from using a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated for
the sex that is not the individual's sex.
(b) If a state educational institution violates section 5 of this
chapter, an individual who is directly or indirectly injured as a
result of the violation may bring a civil action against the state
educational institution.
(c) An action described in this section must be commenced
within two (2) years of the violation.
Sec. 7. The court may award to an individual who prevails in an
action under section 6 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Declaratory judgment.
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 8. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a state educational
institution from:
(1) providing single occupancy sleeping quarters or a single
occupancy restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower
room; or
(2) adopting policies necessary to accommodate individuals
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42
U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and any amendments and regulations
related to the Act.
Sec. 9. The provisions of this chapter are severable as provided
in IC 1-1-1-8(b).".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 182 as introduced.)
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107


CHARBONNEAU, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 9, Nays 3.
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 182 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 8, line 12, after "a" insert "family restroom,".
Page 8, line 31, delete "or".
Page 8, between lines 31 and 32, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(2) individual is less than nine (9) years of age and is
accompanying their parent or caregiver into a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area; or".
Page 8, line 32, delete "(2)" and insert "(3)".
Page 10, line 8, after "a" insert "family restroom,".
Page 10, line 22, delete "or".
Page 10, between lines 22 and 23, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(2) individual is less than nine (9) years of age and is
accompanying their parent or caregiver into a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area; or".
Page 10, line 23, delete "(2)" and insert "(3)".
(Reference is to SB 182 as printed January 23, 2026.)
DEERY
SB 182—LS 6808/DI 107